Washington statutes.
RCW 35.78.010

Classification of streets.

The governing body of each municipal corporation shall classify and designate city streets as follows:

Major arterials, which are defined as transportation arteries which connect the focal points of traffic interest within a city; arteries which provide communications with other communities and the outlying areas; or arteries which have relatively high traffic volume compared with other streets within the city;

Secondary arterials, which are defined as routes which serve lesser points of traffic interest within a city; provide communication with outlying districts in the same degree or serve to collect and distribute traffic from the major arterials to the local streets;

Access streets, which are defined as land service streets and are generally limited to providing access to abutting property. They are tributary to the major and secondary thoroughfares and generally discourage through traffic.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.78.010. Prior: 1949 c 164 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 9300-1.]